District of Columbia statutes.
31-759

Conversion of mutual insurance holding company.

Chapter 9 of this title shall be applicable to the conversion of a mutual insurance holding company formed under this subchapter to a stock company as if the mutual insurance holding company were a mutual insurance company.

May 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-112, § 10, 45 DCR 1792
1981 Ed., § 35-3749.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-751.